New Mexico, session 2026, SB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 3-60A-13.1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws
1985, Chapter 225, Section 2, as amended) is amended to read:
"3-60A-13.1. PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF PROPERTY TAXES AND
ASSESSMENTS.--
A. If interests in project property are exempt
from property taxation and assessments under Subsection B of
Section 3-60A-13 NMSA 1978 or Section 7-36-3.1 NMSA 1978,
then during the period extending from the date of acquisition
of the property by the local government through December 31
of a year that shall not exceed the fourteenth anniversary of
that acquisition date, any lessee of the project property or
owner of a substantial beneficial interest in the project
property, in whose ownership the property would not be
exempt from property taxation except for the exemption
granted under Section 7-36-3.1 NMSA 1978, shall pay to the
county treasurer annually, at the same time property tax
payments are due under the Property Tax Code, an amount equal
to the sum of:
(1) general property taxes that would have SB 58
Page 1

been imposed under Subsection B of Section 7-37-7 NMSA 1978
had it not been exempt and had it been valued at the
valuation for property taxation purposes that existed in the
year immediately preceding the year of acquisition by the
local government;
(2) amounts that would have been imposed
under Subsection C of Section 7-37-7 NMSA 1978 on the project
property had it not been exempt and had it been valued at the
valuation for property taxation purposes that existed in the
year immediately preceding the year of acquisition by the
local government; and
(3) amounts that would have been imposed as
benefit assessments on the project property had it not been
exempt and had it been valued at the valuation for property
taxation purposes that existed in the year immediately
preceding the year of acquisition by the local government if
those benefit assessments are authorized by law and are

expressed in mills per dollar or dollars per thousand dollars

of net taxable value of property, assessed value of property

or similar terms.

B. The county treasurer shall distribute all

amounts collected under Subsection A of this section in the

same manner as the amounts would have been distributed if

they had been collected as taxes or assessments on nonexempt

property.
SB 58
Page 2

C. The provisions of this section shall apply only
to project property acquired by a local government under the
provisions of the Metropolitan Redevelopment Code on or after
January 1, 1986."
SECTION 2. Section 7-36-3.1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1979,
Chapter 56, Section 2, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-36-3.1. METROPOLITAN REDEVELOPMENT PROPERTY--TAX
STATUS OF LESSEE'S INTERESTS.--Property interests of a lessee
in project property held under a lease with respect to a
project authorized by the Metropolitan Redevelopment Code and
acquired or held by a municipality prior to January 1, 1986
under the provisions of that code are exempt from property
taxation for as long as there is an outstanding bonded
indebtedness, but in any event for a period not to exceed
fourteen years from the date of execution of the first lease
of the project by the municipality. Property interests of a
lessee of or an owner of a substantial beneficial interest in

project property acquired or held by a municipality on or

after January 1, 1986 with respect to a project authorized by

the Metropolitan Redevelopment Code are exempt from property

taxation for a period extending from the date of acquisition

of the project property by the municipality through December

of a year that shall not exceed the fourteenth anniversary

of that acquisition date."

SECTION 3. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act
SB 58
Page 3

apply to leases of project property executed on or after the
effective date of this act. SB 58
Page 4